apertium-olo.olo.lexc
LEXICON Root

   adjectives  ;     !!= * @CODE@
   adpositions    ;  !!= * @CODE@
   adverbs  ;	     !!= * @CODE@
   conjunctors  ;    !!= * @CODE@
   determiners  ;    !!= * @CODE@
   interjections  ;  !!= * @CODE@
   nouns   ;	     !!= * @CODE@
   pronouns    ;     !!= * @CODE@
   propernouns    ;  !!= * @CODE@
   propernouns-toponyms    ;  !!= * @CODE@
   quantifiers    ;  !!= * @CODE@
   verbs	  ;	     !!= * @CODE@
   rus-Cyrl-2-Lat-ProperNouns ;  !!= * @CODE@ Derived from urj-Cyrl

!Abbreviation ;	! stems/abbr.lexc
!Acronym ;    	! stems/acro.lexc
 Punctuation ;
 Symbols     ;
 Exceptions ;  !!= * @CODE@

!! NEWWORDS FILES
 A_NEWWORDS ;     !!= @CODE@ adjectives
 ADV_NEWWORDS ;	  !!= @CODE@ adverbs
 N_NEWWORDS ;     !!= @CODE@ nouns
 PROP_NEWWORDS ;     !!= @CODE@ proper nouns
 V_NEWWORDS ;     !!= @CODE@ verbs

!! I INCLUDE SOME SMALL LEXICA HERE
!! WAITING FOR OWN FILES, OR PERHAPS THEY COULD STAY HERE

LEXICON CONJ_
%<cnv%>: # ;

LEXICON CC_
%<cnjcoo%>: # ;

LEXICON CS_
%<cnjsub%>: # ;


LEXICON INTERJ_
%<ij%>: # ;

!LEXICON NUMERAL
!%<num%>: # ;

LEXICON NUMBERSUF
%<num%>: K;
%<num%>:%> CASESUF ;
%<num%>:%> ORDINAL ;

LEXICON ORDINAL
%<ord%>%<FIXME%>:s K;

LEXICON PCLE_
%<part%>: #;


LEXICON PO_
%<post%>: # ;

LEXICON PO-GOV/ILL_
%<post%>: # ;

LEXICON PO_KIELINE
%<post%>: A_KIELINE ;

LEXICON PO_KARJALAINE
%<post%>: A_KARJALAINE ;

LEXICON PREP_
%<pr%>: # ;


LEXICON CASESUF
#;

LEXICON DEM
#;

LEXICON ACRONDELIMITER
# ;

LEXICON WORD-END
# ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:


! Ad hoc lexica (TT)

! ============================= !
! File containing abbreviations !
! ============================= !

! Lexica for adding tags and periods
! ----------------------------------

! Splitting in 3 groups, because of the preprocessor
! - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

LEXICON Abbreviation
noperiod ;
ITRAB ;
TRNUMAB ;
TRAB ;

! Now splitting according to POS, and according to dot or not
! - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

! First collecting POS info, *-noun, *-adv, etc.
! Also splitting when in doubt: -noun-adj => -noun and -adj
! Then pointing to two contlexes, a dot-one and a non-dot-one.

LEXICON ab ! No POS, don't know what pos
ab-nodot ;
ab-dot ;

LEXICON ab-noun
ab-nodot-noun ;
ab-dot-noun ;

!LEXICON ab-adj
!ab-nodot-adj ;
!ab-dot-adj ;

!LEXICON ab-adv
!ab-nodot-adv ;
!ab-dot-adv ;

!LEXICON ab-num
!ab-nodot-num ;
!ab-dot-num;

! Here come POS and Case tags, and no period.

LEXICON ab-nodot-noun ! The bulk
%<n%>%<abbr%>: # ;  ! no period, that is.

LEXICON ab-nodot ! default
%<abbr%>: # ;  ! no period, that is.

! Here come POS and Case tags, with the period added.

LEXICON ab-dot ! Default
%<abbr%>:%. # ;

LEXICON ab-dot-noun ! This is the lexicon for abbrs that must have a period.
%<n%>%<abbr%>:%. # ;

! The idea is that the nominal ones may have case, like e.g. P.E.N.


! The abbreviation lexicon itself
! -------------------------------

! The ones without final period are listed first. They do not
! need the transitivity division.

LEXICON noperiod
км² ab-nodot-noun ;
км ab-nodot-noun ;
см ab-nodot-noun ;
гг ab-nodot-noun ;
м3/с ab-nodot-noun ;
кв  ab-nodot-noun ;

! =============================================== !
!            Intransitive abbreviations           !
! =============================================== !

! These give clause boundaries before capital letters
! and numbers, but not elsewhere.
! Vi bor i Sth. CLB 10 av oss er innflyttere.
! Vi bor i Sth. CLB Saara er også innflytter.
! Vi vet at Sth. er en fin by.


LEXICON ITRAB


в ab ;
г ab ;
гг ab ;


! =============================================== !
!    Transitive number-related abbreviations      !
! =============================================== !

! These ones are transitive when followed by numbers or
! singleton letters, and intransitive elsewhere.
! Gården har Gnr. 10.
! Gården har Gnr. 5. a.
! Alle gårder har ikke Gnr. CLB Det er et problem.
! Alle gårder har ikke Gnr. og det er et problem.

LEXICON TRNUMAB

Apd		ab-dot ;                                      !
Вып ab-dot ;


! =============================================== !
!              Transitive abbreviations           !
! =============================================== !

LEXICON Acronym
< А|Б|В|Г|Д|Е|Ж|З|И|Й|К|Л|М|Н|О|П|Р|С|Т|У|Ф|Х|Ц|Ч|Ш|Щ|Ъ|Ы|Ь|Э|Ю|Я|Ё|І|Ӧ > acr2-cyr  ;
< A|B|C|D|E|F|G|H|I|J|K|L|M|N|O|P|S|Š|Z|Ž|T|U|V|W|X|Ü|Ö|Ä > acr2-lat  ;
                                                                          acros ;

LEXICON acr2-cyr
< А|Б|В|Г|Д|Е|Ж|З|И|Й|К|Л|М|Н|О|П|Р|С|Т|У|Ф|Х|Ц|Ч|Ш|Щ|Ъ|Ы|Ь|Э|Ю|Я|Ё|І|Ӧ > acr3-cyr ;

LEXICON acr3-cyr
< А|Б|В|Г|Д|Е|Ж|З|И|Й|К|Л|М|Н|О|П|Р|С|Т|У|Ф|Х|Ц|Ч|Ш|Щ|Ъ|Ы|Ь|Э|Ю|Я|Ё|І|Ӧ > acr4-cyr    ;
                                                                          acrotag ;

LEXICON acr4-cyr
< А|Б|В|Г|Д|Е|Ж|З|И|Й|К|Л|М|Н|О|П|Р|С|Т|У|Ф|Х|Ц|Ч|Ш|Щ|Ъ|Ы|Ь|Э|Ю|Я|Ё|І|Ӧ > acr5-cyr    ;
                                                                          acrotag ;

LEXICON acr5-cyr
< А|Б|В|Г|Д|Е|Ж|З|И|Й|К|Л|М|Н|О|П|Р|С|Т|У|Ф|Х|Ц|Ч|Ш|Щ|Ъ|Ы|Ь|Э|Ю|Я|Ё|І|Ӧ > acrotag ;
                                                                          acrotag ;

LEXICON acr2-lat
< A|B|C|D|E|F|G|H|I|J|K|L|M|N|O|P|S|Š|Z|Ž|T|U|V|W|X|Ü|Ö|Ä > acr3-lat  ;
                                                            acrotag ;

LEXICON acr3-lat
< A|B|C|D|E|F|G|H|I|J|K|L|M|N|O|P|S|Š|Z|Ž|T|U|V|W|X|Ü|Ö|Ä > acr4-lat  ;
                                                            acrotag ;

LEXICON acr4-lat
< A|B|C|D|E|F|G|H|I|J|K|L|M|N|O|P|S|Š|Z|Ž|T|U|V|W|X|Ü|Ö|Ä > acr5-lat  ;
                                                            acrotag ;

LEXICON acr5-lat
< A|B|C|D|E|F|G|H|I|J|K|L|M|N|O|P|S|Š|Z|Ž|T|U|V|W|X|Ü|Ö|Ä > acrotag ;
                                                            acrotag ;



LEXICON acros
см³ acrotag ; !Cyrillic letters
cm³ acrotag ; !Latin letters
°C  acrotag ;
K   acrotag ; ! Kelvin, Latin letter K

LEXICON acrotag
%<n%>%<acr%>: ACRONDELIMITER ;


LEXICON adpositions

tagua%<post%>:tagua PO_  "" ;
puolez%<post%>:puolez PO_  "" ;
vaste%<post%>:vaste PO_  "vasten" ;
aiguhine%<post%>:aiguhi PO_KIELINE  "aikainen" ;
aiguhine%<post%>:aigu PO_KARJALAINE  "aikainen" ;
mugah%<post%>:mugah PO_  "mukaan" ;
nähte%<post%>:nähte PO-GOV/ILL_  "" ;
alle%<pr%>:alle PREP_  "" ;
aloh%<pr%>:aloh PREP_  "" ;
ennem%<pr%>:ennem PREP_  "" ;
eziči%<post%>:eziči PO_  "ohitse" ;
ennen%<pr%>:ennen PREP_  "" ;
ielpäi%<pr%>:ielpäi PREP_  "" ;
kohtas%<pr%>:kohtas PREP_  "" ;
kohti%<pr%>:kohti PREP_  "" ;
luo%<pr%>:luo PREP_  "" ;
niškoi%<pr%>:niškoi PREP_  "" ;
näh%<pr%>:näh PREP_  "" ;
periä%<pr%>:periä PREP_  "" ;
rinnal%<pr%>:rinnal PREP_  "" ;
sah%<pr%>:sah PREP_  "" ;
tokkua%<pr%>:tokkua PREP_  "takia" ;
täh%<pr%>:täh PREP_  "tähden" ;
vastal%<pr%>:vastal PREP_  "" ;

LEXICON TRAB
досл ab-dot ;
A ab-noun ;
B ab-noun ;
C ab-noun ;
Č ab-noun ;
D ab-noun ;
F ab-noun ;
G ab-noun ;
H ab-noun ;
I ab-noun ;
J ab-noun ;
K ab-noun ;
L ab-noun ;
M ab-noun ;
N ab-noun ;
O ab-noun ;
P ab-noun ;
R ab-noun ;
S ab-noun ;
Š ab-noun ;
Z ab-noun ;
Ž ab-noun ;
T ab-noun ;
U ab-noun ;
V ab-noun ;
Ü ab-noun ;
Ä ab-noun ;
Ö ab-noun ;
a ab-noun ;
b ab-noun ;
c ab-noun ;
č ab-noun ;
d ab-noun ;
f ab-noun ;
g ab-noun ;
h ab-noun ;
i ab-noun ;
j ab-noun ;
k ab-noun ;
l ab-noun ;
m ab-noun ;
n ab-noun ;
o ab-noun ;
p ab-noun ;
r ab-noun ;
s ab-noun ;
š ab-noun ;
z ab-noun ;
ž ab-noun ;
t ab-noun ;
u ab-noun ;
v ab-noun ;
ü ab-noun ;
ä ab-noun ;
ö ab-noun ;
LEXICON Exceptions
kui:kui CS_  "kuinka, miten, millä tavoin; kuin, niin kuin; koska, siksi, että; jos; jospa, kunpa; jotta; kun, kerran; -pa, .pä" ;
libo:libo CC_  "vai, vai; eli" ;
što:što CS_  "että, jotta" ;
štobi:štobi CS_  "jotta, että" ;
hoš:hoš CS_ "" ;
muga% že:muga% že CONJ_  "niin, näin, noin; -kin, -kaan, -kään" ;
sendäh:sendäh CONJ_  "siksi, sen tähden; sentään, kuitenkin, kuitenkaan, siitä huolimatta" ;
vie:vie CONJ_  " lisäksi, vielä; jopa, suorastaan; yhä edelleen, vielä" ;
al:al INTERJ_ "" ;
ali:ali INTERJ_ "" ;
däh:däh INTERJ_ "" ;
aku:aku INTERJ_ "" ;
ga:ga CC_ "" ;
gai:gai INTERJ_ "" ;
hoš:hoš INTERJ_ "" ;
jo:jo INTERJ_ "" ;
joi:joi INTERJ_ "" ;
ka:ka INTERJ_ "" ;
kei:kei INTERJ_ "" ;
konah:konah INTERJ_ "" ;
korvah:korvah INTERJ_ "" ;
kouzollou:kouzollou INTERJ_ "" ;
kulleh:kulleh INTERJ_ "" ;
kulmas:kulmas INTERJ_ "" ;
libo:libo CS_ "" ;
migu:migu INTERJ_ "" ;
mis:mis INTERJ_ "" ;
myö:myö INTERJ_ "" ;
no:no INTERJ_ "" ;
nolja:nolja INTERJ_ "" ;
näi:näi INTERJ_ "" ;
se:se INTERJ_ "" ;
tai:tai INTERJ_ "" ;
tuan:tuan INTERJ_ "" ;
vaigu:vaigu INTERJ_ "" ;
piäh:piäh PO_ "" ;
piäle:piäle PO_ "" ;
piäs:piäs PO_ "" ;
i:i PCLE_ "ja" ;
LEXICON nouns
vet%<part%>:vet PCLE_  "-han" ;
